Delaware, session 153, HB86.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 1083, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1083. Counting ballots; tie vote; certification of election. (e) Within 96 hours following the certification of a public school election, 25 or more persons who voted in the aforesaid public school election may petition the Department of Elections that conducted the election for a recompilation of the results, if If the difference in the election of a school board member or in an election conducted in accordance with Chapter 19, 20 20, or 21 of this title was less than 10 votes orÂ 1 / 2 Â of 1 percent is 1% or less of the total vote whichever is larger. The petition shall contain the printed name, signature and the voting location of each petitioner. The recompilation shall be conducted no later than 5 business days after the verification of the petition. The all votes cast in that election, the Department of Elections that conducted the elections shall: shall recount the ballots cast in that election at state expense. (1) Examine the voting machine tape from each voting machine used in the election and determine if the results were properly reported. The department shall then correct any results that were incorrectly reported. (2) Examine the absentee vote tally sheets and determine if errors were made in reporting the absentee vote. The department shall then correct any errors in the reporting of the absentee votes. (3) Count or cause to be counted all absentee ballots that were cast in the election and correct any errors in the tally that had been reported. (4) Certify or, if necessary, recertify the recompiled results as required by this title. Section 2. Amend Â§ 3172, Title 15 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 3172. Calculation of votes; ties. (e) If the number of votes separating a the candidate with the most votes and the closest opposing candidate in a primary election is less than 1,000 votes, in the case of a statewide contest, or Â½ of 1% or less of all votes cast for the 2 candidates, in the case of any other contest, whichever is less, the Department shall recount the ballots cast in that election at state expense as part of the canvass of the vote. Section 3. Amend Â§ 5702, Title 15 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 5702. Duties of Court. (c) Any If the number of votes separating the candidate with the most votes and the closest opposing candidate for statewide office in a general election may apply to the Court for a recount of all the ballots cast and recorded for such office if the number of votes separating such candidate and the closest opposing candidate is less than 1,000 votes or less than one half of one percent is 1% or less of all votes cast for the two 2 candidates, whichever amount is less. Such recount shall thereupon be conducted by the Court shall recount the ballots cast in that election at state expense. The request for a recount under this subsection must be presented before the adjournment of the board of canvass for the election in question and any recount that takes place shall not extend beyond the petitionerâs contest. (e) If the number of votes separating a the candidate with the most votes and the closest opposing candidate in an election for State Senator, State Representative, or county office is less than 1,000 votes orÂ 1 / 2 Â of 1% or less of all votes cast for the 2 candidates, whichever is less, the Court shall recount the ballots cast in that election at state expense.